Massachusetts, session 194th, S726.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 17O the following new section:-
Section 17O 1/2. The group insurance commission and any carrier as defined in section 1
of chapter 176O or other entity which contracts with the commission to provide health benefits
to eligible employees and retirees and their eligible dependents shall not decline to provide
coverage for medical, behavioral or health care services solely on the basis that those services
were delivered by a health care provider, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, participating in
a mobile integrated health care program approved by the department of public health pursuant to
chapter 111O. Medical, behavioral or health care services delivered by way of an approved
mobile integrated health care program shall be covered to the same extent as if they were
of 7

provided in a health care facility, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, and the rates of
payments for otherwise covered services shall not be reduced on the grounds that those services
were delivered by a health care provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health
care program. A contract that provides coverage for care delivered may contain a provision for a
deductible, copayment or coinsurance requirement for a service provided by a health care
provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health care program as long as the
deductible, copayment or coinsurance does not exceed the deductible, copayment or coinsurance
applicable to delivery of the same services within a health care facility.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 111C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following subsection:-
(c) MIH programs that are focused on behavioral health services shall not be subject to
application and registration fees.
SECTION 3. Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 10K the following new section:-
Section 10KK. The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health
maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third party administrators
under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization, the Medicaid primary care clinician
plan, or an accountable care organization shall not decline to provide coverage for medical,
behavioral or health care services solely on the basis that those services were delivered by a
health care provider, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, participating in a mobile integrated
health care program approved by the department of public health pursuant to chapter 111O.
Medical, behavioral or health care services delivered by way of an approved mobile integrated
of 7

health care program shall be covered to the same extent as if they were provided in a health care
facility, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, and the rates of payments for otherwise covered
services shall not be reduced on the grounds that those services were delivered by a health care
provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health care program. A contract that
provides coverage for care delivered may contain a provision for a deductible, copayment or
coinsurance requirement for a service provided by a health care provider participating in an
approved mobile integrated health care program as long as the deductible, copayment or
coinsurance does not exceed the deductible, copayment or coinsurance applicable to delivery of
the same services within a health care facility.
SECTION 4. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 47II the following new section:-
Section 47III. Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued,
delivered or renewed within the commonwealth, shall not decline to provide coverage for
medical, behavioral or health care services solely on the basis that those services were delivered
by a health care provider, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, participating in a mobile
integrated health care program approved by the department of public health pursuant to chapter
111O. Medical, behavioral or health care services delivered by way of an approved mobile
integrated health care program shall be covered to the same extent as if they were provided in a
health care facility, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, and the rates of payments for
otherwise covered services shall not be reduced on the grounds that those services were delivered
by a health care provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health care program. A
contract that provides coverage for care delivered may contain a provision for a deductible,
copayment or coinsurance requirement for a service provided by a health care provider
of 7

participating in an approved mobile integrated health care program as long as the deductible,
copayment or coinsurance does not exceed the deductible, copayment or coinsurance applicable
to delivery of the same services within a health care facility.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 8L the following new section:-
Section 8LL. Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual
or group hospital service plan which is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth
shall not decline to provide coverage for medical, behavioral or health care services delivered by
a health care provider, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, participating in a mobile
integrated health care program approved by the department of public health pursuant to chapter
111O. Medical, behavioral or health care services delivered by way of an approved mobile
integrated health care program shall be covered to the same extent as if they were provided in a
health care facility, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, and the rates of payments for
otherwise covered services shall not be reduced on the grounds that those services were delivered
by a health care provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health care program. A
contract that provides coverage for care delivered may contain a provision for a deductible,
copayment or coinsurance requirement for a service provided by a health care provider
participating in an approved mobile integrated health care program as long as the deductible,
copayment or coinsurance does not exceed the deductible, copayment or coinsurance applicable
to delivery of the same services within a health care facility.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 4L the following new section:-
of 7

Section 4LL. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall not decline to provide
coverage for medical, behavioral or health care services delivered by a health care provider, as
defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, participating in a mobile integrated health care program
approved by the department of public health pursuant to chapter 111O. Medical, behavioral or
health care services delivered by way of an approved mobile integrated health care program shall
be covered to the same extent as if they were provided in a health care facility, as defined in
section 1 of chapter 111O, and the rates of payments for otherwise covered services shall not be
reduced on the grounds that those services were delivered by a health care provider participating
in an approved mobile integrated health care program. A contract that provides coverage for care
delivered may contain a provision for a deductible, copayment or coinsurance requirement for a
service provided by a health care provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health
care program as long as the deductible, copayment or coinsurance does not exceed the
deductible, copayment or coinsurance applicable to delivery of the same services within a health
care facility.
SECTION 7. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 4C the following new section:-
Section 4CC. Any individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or
renewed shall not decline to provide coverage for medical, behavioral or health care services
delivered by a health care provider, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, participating in a
mobile integrated health care program approved by the department of public health pursuant to
chapter 111O. Medical, behavioral, or health care services delivered by way of an approved
100 mobile integrated health care program shall be covered to the same extent as if they were
of 7

101 provided in a health care facility, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, and the rates of
102 payments for otherwise covered services shall not be reduced on the grounds that those services
103 were delivered by a health care provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health
104 care program. A contract that provides coverage for care delivered may contain a provision for a
105 deductible, copayment or coinsurance requirement for a service provided by a health care
106 provider participating in an approved mobile integrated health care program as long as the
107 deductible, copayment or coinsurance does not exceed the deductible, copayment or coinsurance
108 applicable to delivery of the same services within a health care facility.
109 SECTION 8. Chapter 176I of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
110 inserting after section 12 the following new section:-
111 Section 13. An organization entering into a preferred provider contract shall not decline
112 to provide coverage for medical, behavioral or health care services delivered by a health care
113 provider, as defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, participating in a mobile integrated health care
114 program approved by the department of public health pursuant to chapter 111O. Medical,
115 behavioral, or health care services delivered by way of an approved mobile integrated health care
116 program shall be covered to the same extent as if they were provided in a health care facility, as
117 defined in section 1 of chapter 111O, and the rates of payments for otherwise covered services
118 shall not be reduced on the grounds that those services were delivered by a health care provider
119 participating in an approved mobile integrated health care program. A contract that provides
120 coverage for care delivered may contain a provision for a deductible, copayment or coinsurance
121 requirement for a service provided by a health care provider participating in an approved mobile
122 integrated health care program as long as the deductible, copayment or coinsurance does not
of 7

123 exceed the deductible, copayment or coinsurance applicable to delivery of the same services
124 within a health care facility.
of 7